District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

2-1516.01

Youth Jobs Fund.

Repealed.

History

Aug. 16, 2008, D.C. Law 17-219, § 1009, 55 DCR 7598
Feb. 26, 2015, D.C. Law 20-155, § 9016, 61 DCR 9990

Emergency Legislation

For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see §§ 9016 and 9029 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-377, July 14, 2014, 61 DCR 7598, 20 STAT 3696).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9016 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-449, October 10, 2014, 61 DCR 10915, 20 STAT 4188).
For temporary (90 days) repeal of this section, see § 9016 of the Fiscal Year 2015 Budget Support Second Congressional Review Emergency Act of 2014 (D.C. Act 20-566, January 9, 2015, 62 DCR 884, 21 STAT 541).

Short Title

Short title: Section 1008 of D.C. Law 17-219 provided that subtitle D of title I of the act may be cited as the “Youth Jobs Fund Establishment Act of 2008”.

Editor's Notes

Section 9029 of D.C. Law 20-155 provided that the repeal by § 9016 of the act shall apply as of September 30, 2014.